Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 8. Radiation Control.
§ 32.1-238.
Impounding sources of ionizing radiation.

The Department is authorized, in the event of an emergency or under other circumstances constituting a hazard to health and safety, to impound or order the impounding of sources of ionizing radiation in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of this article or any regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-414.17; 1964, c. 158; 1979, c. 711; 2008, cc. 41, 466.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 41 and 466 are identical, and substituted “Department” for “Commissioner,” inserted “or under other circumstances” and deleted “the public” preceding “health and safety.”